Arkansas, session 2025, SB514.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE GENERAL ASSEMBLY OF THE STATE OF ARKANSAS:

SECTION 1. Arkansas Code § 5-37-219(c), concerning the penalty for
unlawful possession of a skimmer, is amended to read as follows:
(c)(1) Unlawful possession of a skimmer is a Class C felony.
(2) A second or subsequent conviction under this section is an
unclassified felony with a mandatory fine of not more than twenty thousand
dollars ($20,000) and a mandatory term of imprisonment of at least one (1)
year but not more than ten (10) years.







*ANS327*
03/18/2025 4:23:21 PM ANS327